Louisiana, session 2026, HB132.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:33 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§33. Battery defined
Battery is the intentional use of force or violence upon the person of another;
or the intentional administration of a poison or other noxious liquid or substance to
another; or the intentional directing of sound at another, in close proximity to
another's ear or head, under circumstances in which the sound is capable of causing
physical pain, hearing impairment, or bodily injury, and in such a manner that a
reasonable person would foresee that the conduct would cause physical pain, hearing
impairment, or bodily injury.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.